Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2110
Fees; deposits; charges.

(1) The lessor may contract for and receive:

(a) An initial nonrefundable administrative fee of not more than ten dollars;

(b) A security deposit, if the amount of the deposit and the conditions under which all or a part of the deposit will be returned is disclosed with the disclosures required by sections 69-2104 and 69-2105;

(c) A delivery charge of not more than ten dollars or, in the case of a consumer rental purchase agreement covering more than five items, a delivery charge of not more than twenty-five dollars, if (i) the lessor actually delivers the items to the place designated by the consumer, (ii) the delivery charge is disclosed with the disclosures required by sections 69-2104 and 69-2105, and (iii) such charge is in lieu of and not in addition to the administrative fee in subsection (1) of this section;

(d) Late fees as follows:

(i) For consumer rental purchase agreements with monthly renewal dates, a late fee of not more than five dollars may be assessed on any payment not made within five business days after the payment is due;

(ii) For consumer rental purchase agreements with more frequent than monthly renewal dates, a late fee of not more than three dollars may be assessed on any payment not made within three business days after payment is due; and

(iii) A late fee on a consumer rental purchase agreement may be collected only once on any accrued payment no matter how long such payment remains unpaid, may be collected at the time it accrues or at any time thereafter, and shall not be assessed against a payment that is timely made even though an earlier late fee has not been paid in full; and

(e) In addition to any applicable late fee, a reinstatement fee of not more than five dollars which may be assessed only if the consumer exercises the reinstatement provision of the agreement.

(2) The parties may contract for fees for liability damage waiver or similar products or services if:

(a) Purchasing the product or service is optional and is not a factor in the approval of the lessor of the consumer rental purchase transaction and such facts are clearly disclosed in writing to the consumer; and

(b) The consumer has signed or initialed an affirmative written request to purchase the product or service after receiving a written disclosure of the cost of such product or service.

(3) In addition to the requirements in subsection (2) of this section a contract containing fees for liability damage waiver shall include the following:

(a) For a consumer rental purchase agreement with scheduled lease payments more frequent than monthly, the amount of the liability damage waiver shall not exceed eight percent of any lease payment or two dollars for each scheduled lease payment, whichever is greater; and

(b) For a consumer rental purchase agreement with monthly lease payments, the amount of the liability damage waiver shall not exceed eight percent of any lease payment or five dollars for each scheduled lease payment, whichever is greater.

(4) The parties may contract for other products or services incidental to the consumer rental purchase transaction which do not evade the provisions of the Consumer Rental Purchase Agreement Act.

Laws 1989, LB 681, § 10;

Laws 1993, LB 111, § 4;

Laws 2001, LB 641, § 6.